Maryland, session 2025, SB0364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
2–209.
(a) In this section, “vehicle” includes a motor vehicle, streetcar, locomotive,
engine, and train.
(b) A person may not cause the death of another as a result of the person’s driving,
operating, or controlling a vehicle or vessel in a grossly negligent manner.
(c) A violation of this section is manslaughter by vehicle or vessel.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0364*

SENATE BILL 364
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who
violates this section is guilty of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding [10] 20 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(2) (i) A person who violates this section, having previously been
convicted under this section, § 2–210, § 2–503, § 2–504, § 2–505, § 2–506, or § 3–211 of this
article, or § 21–902 of the Transportation Article, is guilty of a felony and on conviction is
subject to imprisonment not exceeding [15] 30 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or
both.
(ii) For the purposes of application of subsequent offender penalties
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a conviction for a crime committed in another
state or federal jurisdiction that, if committed in this State would constitute a violation of
this section, § 2–210, § 2–503, § 2–504, § 2–505, § 2–506, or § 3–211 of this article, or §
21–902 of the Transportation Article, shall be considered a violation of this section.
(e) (1) An indictment or other charging document for manslaughter by vehicle
or vessel is sufficient if it substantially states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) killed (name of victim) in a grossly
negligent manner against the peace, government, and dignity of the State.”.
(2) An indictment or other charging document for manslaughter by vehicle
or vessel need not set forth the manner or means of death.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.